California statutes. Elections Code
(b) If a tie vote makes it impossible to determine which of two or more candidates has been elected, the county elections official shall notify the governing body of the district thereof, and the governing body shall forthwith notify the candidates who have received the tie votes to appear before it either personally or by representative at a time and place designated by the governing body. The governing body shall, at that time and place, determine the tie by lot and the results thereof shall be declared by the governing body. The candidate so chosen shall qualify, take office and serve as though elected at the preceding general district election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10553.

The county elections official shall immediately make and deliver to each person elected a certificate of election signed by the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10554.

Elective officers, elected or appointed pursuant to this part, take office at noon on the first Friday in December next following the general district election. Prior to taking office, each elective officer shall take the official oath and execute any bond required by the principal act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10555.

Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1, no landowner voting district election shall be consolidated with any resident voter election regardless of whether it is held pursuant to this part. Except as specified in the preceding sentence, an election conducted by a district subject to this part may be consolidated with any other election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10556.

No informalities in the conduct of the general district election or any matters related to it shall invalidate the election if fairly conducted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. SCHOOL DISTRICT AND COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT GOVERNING BOARD ELECTIONS [10600. - 10604.]

10600.

When one member of the governing board of a school district or community college district is to be elected, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected. When two or more members are to be elected, the two or more candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected. Each voter may vote for as many candidates as there are members to be elected. The ballot shall contain instructions stating the maximum number of candidates for whom each voter may vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

Notwithstanding Section 10600, the governing board of any community college district may, by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the board, assign a number to each seat on the board to be selected by lot. Once the numbers are assigned, any candidate for election to the board shall be required to run for a particular numbered seat on the board and be elected by the voters of the district at large.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

(a) The forms for declaration of candidacy for governing board elections shall be in substantially the following form:

“I, _____, do hereby declare myself as a candidate for election to the governing board of _____ District, of the County of ____; I am a registered voter; if elected I will qualify and serve to the best of my ability; and I request my name be placed on the official ballots of the district, for the election to be held on the ___ day of ____, 20__.Residence address: ”(b) In an election held under Section 5018 of the Education Code to elect additional governing board members, all candidates for member of the governing board shall also indicate on their declaration of candidacy whether they are candidates for the existing office or for the new offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 11.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

(a) In any school district or community college district governing board election the name of any person shall be placed on the ballot, subject to Sections 35107 and 72103 of the Education Code, if there is filed with the county elections official having jurisdiction, not more than 113 days nor less than 88 days prior to the election, a declaration of candidacy containing the appropriate information in the blank spaces and signed by the person whose name is thereby to be placed on the ballot.

(b) No candidate whose declaration of candidacy has been filed for any school district or community college district governing board election or county board of education election may withdraw as a candidate after the 88th day prior to the election.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in subdivision (d), no person shall file nomination papers for more than one district office, including a county board of education office, at the same election.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a proposal to form a unified school district is on the same ballot as the election of governing board members of that district, any candidate for a position on the existing governing board may file nomination papers for that position pursuant to subdivision (a) and may, at the same election, also file nomination papers for a position on the
 governing board of the proposed unified school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 54.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10603, if a declaration of candidacy for an incumbent member of a school district or community college district governing board or of a county board of education is not filed by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the election, or is filed but then is withdrawn before 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the election, any person, other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day, shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before an election to file a declaration of candidacy for the elective office.

(b) This section is not applicable where there is no incumbent eligible to be elected. If this section is applicable, notwithstanding Section
 10603, a candidate whose declaration of candidacy has been filed for any school district or community college district governing board election or county board of education election may withdraw as a candidate until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 14.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. Special District Elections [10650. - 10650.]

10650.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a governing body of a special district may require, by resolution, that the members of its governing body be elected using district-based elections, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14026, without being required to submit the resolution to the voters for approval. A resolution adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include a declaration that the change in the method of electing members of the governing body is being made in furtherance of the purposes of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code).

(b) For purposes of this section, “special
 district” means an agency of the state formed pursuant to general law or special act for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “Special district” does not include a city, county, city and county, school or community college district, special assessment district, or district with appointed members on its governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   (AB 2389)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. ELECTIONS TO FILL VACANCIES [10700. - 10735.]



  CHAPTER 1. Nomination of Candidates for Legislative and Congressional Offices at Special Elections [10700. - 10707.]

10700.

The Governor shall call all statewide special elections by issuing a proclamation pursuant to Section 12000. Except as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10730), in the case of a vacancy in a congressional or legislative office the Governor shall issue a proclamation, within 14 calendar days of the occurrence of the vacancy, calling a special election in accordance with Section 10703. A copy of the proclamation shall be sent to the board of supervisors of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

(a) When a vacancy occurs in a congressional office after the close of the nomination period in the final year of the term of office, the Governor may decline to issue an election proclamation at his discretion.

(b) When a vacancy occurs in a legislative office after the close of the nomination period in the final year of the term of office, no special election shall be held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

Except as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10730), this chapter provides the procedures for nomination and election of candidates at any special election to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in Congress, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 658, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in Congress, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly shall be conducted on a Tuesday at least 126 days, but not more than 140 days, following the issuance of an election proclamation by the Governor pursuant to Section 1773 of the Government Code.

(2) A special election to fill a vacancy in an office listed in paragraph (1) may be conducted within 200 days following the proclamation in order to consolidate the election or the primary election with an election occurring wholly or partially within the same territory in which the vacancy exists.

(b) Except as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10730), a special election or a primary election shall not be conducted on the day after a state holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 854, Sec. 6.   (AB 3284)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a special primary election shall be held in the district in which the vacancy occurred on the 9th Tuesday or, if the 9th Tuesday is the day of or the day following a state holiday, the 10th Tuesday preceding the day of the special general election at which the vacancy is to be filled. Candidates at the primary election shall be nominated in the manner set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8000) of Part 1 of Division 8, except that nomination papers shall not be circulated more than 73 days before the primary election, shall be left with the county elections official for examination not less than 53 days before the primary election, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than
 53 days before the primary election.

(b) A special primary election shall be held in the district in which the vacancy occurred on the 10th Tuesday preceding the day of the special general election at which the vacancy is to be filled if both of the following conditions apply:

(1) The 10th Tuesday preceding the day of the special general election is an established election date pursuant to Section 1000.

(2) A statewide or local election occurring wholly or partially within the same territory in which the vacancy exists is scheduled for the 10th Tuesday preceding the day of the special general election.

(c) The sample ballot for a special election shall contain a written
 explanation of the election procedure for voter-nominated office as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 9083.5. Immediately after the explanation shall be printed the following: “If one candidate receives more than 50% of the votes cast at the special primary election, the candidate will be elected to fill the vacancy and no special general election will be held.”

(d) On the ballot for a special election, immediately before or above the first contest for a voter-nominated office, the following words shall be printed:

“Voter-Nominated Offices

All voters may vote in these contests.

Candidates display a party preference (or None) for the information of voters. This is not a party endorsement or
 approval.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 9.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

(a) All candidates shall be listed on one ballot and, except as provided in subdivision (b), if any candidate receives a majority of all votes cast, he or she shall be declared elected, and no special general election shall be held.

(b) If only one candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the special general election ballot, that candidate shall be declared elected, and no special general election shall be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 42.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.

If no candidate receives a majority of votes cast, the names of the candidates who receive the highest or second highest number of votes cast at the special primary election shall be placed on the special general election ballot. In the case of a tie vote, subdivision (b) of Section 8142 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 33.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10707.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, whenever a special general election, or a special primary election, to fill a vacancy in Congress or the State Legislature is consolidated with a statewide election, the candidates to fill the vacancy shall appear on the consolidated ballot immediately preceding the candidates for that same seat in Congress or the seat in the Legislature that most nearly encompasses the same geographical area at the statewide election, or the elections official at his or her option may print a separate and distinct ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Vacancy in Senate [10720. - 10720.]

10720.

(a) If a vacancy occurs in the representation of this state in the Senate of the United States, the Governor may appoint and commission an elector of this state who possesses the qualifications for the office to temporarily fill the vacancy until a person is elected at a statewide general election to hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term and is admitted to the vacated seat by the United States Senate.
 The person so elected shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(b) The Governor shall issue a writ of election for a statewide general election to fill a vacancy described in subdivision (a) in accordance with the following:

(1) If the vacancy occurs 148 days or more before the regularly scheduled statewide primary election next following the occurrence of the vacancy, a statewide primary election and a statewide general election to fill the vacancy shall be held on the same dates as, and consolidated with, the regularly scheduled statewide primary and general elections, respectively, next following the occurrence of the vacancy.

(2) If the vacancy occurs less than 148 days before the
 regularly scheduled statewide primary election next following the occurrence of the vacancy, a statewide primary election and a statewide general election to fill the vacancy shall be held on the same dates as, and consolidated with, the second regularly scheduled statewide primary and general elections, respectively, next following the occurrence of the vacancy.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if an election date prescribed by subdivision (b) would occur after the expiration of the term in which the vacancy occurred, the Governor shall consult with the Secretary of State as to whether it is practical to issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy before the expiration of the term. If the Governor determines, in the Governor’s discretion, that it is practical, the Governor may issue a writ of election for special statewide
 primary and general elections to fill the vacancy.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the following apply whenever an election to fill a vacancy in the United States Senate is consolidated with a statewide election and appears on the same ballot as a regular election for the term of the Senate seat subsequent to the term in which the vacancy occurred:

(1) The candidates for the election to fill the vacancy shall appear on the consolidated ballot immediately after the candidates for the regular election for the succeeding term.

(2) Elections officials who provide voter information guides, sample ballots, and ballot materials shall include on those materials a notice that advises voters that the ballot includes elections for
 the succeeding term and for the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacated Senate seat. The notice shall appear in boldface type and in a clearly legible font size. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the language for the notice.

(3) Elections officials who provide ballots for a consolidated election pursuant to this section shall include on the ballot, in a box immediately above the spaces on the ballot for United States Senate elections, a notice that advises voters that the ballot includes elections for the succeeding term and for the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacated Senate seat. The notice shall appear in a boldface type and a clearly legible font size. The
 Secretary of State shall prescribe the language for the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.   (AB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Vacancies in Congressional Offices caused by Catastrophe [10730. - 10735.]

10730.

(a) This chapter provides the procedures for nomination and election of candidates at a special election to fill vacancies in the House of Representatives caused by a catastrophe.

(b) The procedures provided by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10700) shall apply to special elections to the extent those provisions are not inconsistent with this chapter or Section 8 of Title 2 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 306, Sec. 2.   (SB 211)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10731.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Catastrophe” means a natural or man-made event that causes a vacancy in at least 101 of the offices of the United States House of Representatives, including at least one of the offices representing California, or at least one-fourth of the total number of offices representing California.

(b) “Vacancy” means the death or disappearance, as a result of a catastrophe, of a Representative in Congress.

(c) “Disappearance” means the inability to establish conclusively whether a Representative in
 Congress has survived a catastrophe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 306, Sec. 3.   (SB 211)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10732.

Within seven calendar days of a catastrophe, the Governor shall issue a proclamation calling a special election pursuant to Section 10703.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 658, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.

(a) In the event of a catastrophe that causes a vacancy in at least 101 of the offices of the United States House of Representatives, including at least one of the offices representing California, a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in Congress shall be conducted on a Tuesday not more than 49 days following the announcement of the vacancy by the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 8 of Title 2 of the United States Code. Notwithstanding Section 10732, the Governor shall issue a proclamation calling the special election within one day of the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives announcing the vacancy. In the event of a catastrophe that causes a
 vacancy in at least one-fourth of the total offices of the United States House of Representatives representing California but not a vacancy in at least 101 of the offices of the United States House of Representatives, the special election shall occur on a Tuesday not more than 49 days following the issuance of an election proclamation by the Governor.

(b) A special election may be conducted within 75 days following the proclamation in order that the special election may be consolidated with the next regularly scheduled statewide election or local election occurring wholly or partially within the same territory in which the vacancy exists, provided that the voters eligible to vote in the local election comprise at least 50 percent of all the voters eligible to vote on the vacancy.

(c) A special election to fill a vacancy caused by a catastrophe that causes vacancies in at least 101
 of the offices of the United States House of Representatives pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be conducted if any of the following is scheduled to occur within 75 days of the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives calling the vacancy:

(1) A regularly scheduled general election for the vacant office.

(2) A special election for the vacant office, conducted pursuant to a proclamation issued by the Governor prior to the date on which the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives announced the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 306, Sec. 4.   (SB 211)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10734.

A special primary election shall not be held for a special general election conducted pursuant to this chapter. Candidates at the special general election shall be nominated in the manner set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8000) of Part 1 of Division 8, except that nomination papers shall not be circulated more than 46 days before the special general election, shall be left with the county elections official for examination not less than 39 days before the special general election, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than 35 days before the special general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 26.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.

(a) (1) In the case of a special election due to a catastrophe that causes a vacancy in at least 101 offices of the United States House of Representatives, the county elections official shall, to the greatest extent practicable, deliver vote by mail ballots requested pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3101) of Division 3 not later than 15 days after the date on which the Speaker of the United States House of
 Representatives announces the vacancy.

(2) In the case of a special election due to a catastrophe that causes a vacancy in at least one-fourth of the total offices of the United States House of Representatives representing California but not a vacancy in at least 101 of the offices of the United States House of Representatives, the county elections official shall, to the greatest extent practicable, deliver vote by mail ballots requested pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3101) of Division 3 not later than 15 days after the date on which the Governor issues the proclamation calling the election to fill the vacancy.

(b) A vote by mail ballot cast pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3101) of Division 3 in a special general election
 conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be postmarked not later than the date of the election, shall be received by the county elections official not later than 45 days after the date on which the elections official transmitted the ballot to the voter, and shall comply with all other relevant requirements of this code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any deadlines relating to canvassing, announcement of election results, or certification of election results may be extended for a reasonable period of time to facilitate the tabulating and processing of ballots cast pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section
 3101) of Division 3. An extension of a deadline pursuant to this section must be authorized by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 560, Sec. 8.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. RECALL ELECTIONS [11000. - 11386.]



CHAPTER 1. General Procedures: General Provisions and Initial Steps in the Recall [11000. - 11047.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11000. - 11007.]

11000.

This division governs the recall of elective officers of the State of California and of all counties, cities, school districts, county boards of education, community college districts, special districts, and judges of courts of appeal and superior courts. It does not supersede the provisions of a city charter or county charter, or of ordinances adopted pursuant to a city charter or county charter, relating to recall.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 3.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

For the purposes of this division, judges of courts of appeal shall be considered state officers, and judges of superior courts shall be considered county officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 4.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

For the purposes of this division, “elections official” means one of the following:

(a) A county elections official in the case of the recall of elective officers of a county, school district, county board of education, community college district, or resident voting district, and of judges of superior courts.

(b) A city elections official, including, but not necessarily limited to, a city clerk, in the case of the recall of elective officers of a city.

(c) The secretary of the governing board in the case of the recall of elective officers of a landowner voting district or any district in which, at a regular election, candidate’s nomination papers are filed
 with the secretary of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 5.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

For the purposes of this division, “governing board” means a city council, the board of supervisors of a county, the board of trustees of a school district or community college district, or the legislative body of a special district, as the context requires. In the case of the recall of a superior court judge, “governing board” means the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 6.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

For the purposes of this division, a “local officer” is an elective officer of a city, county, school district, community college district, or special district, or a judge of a superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 7.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

The proponents of a recall must be registered voters of the electoral jurisdiction of the officer they seek to recall.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

Proceedings may be commenced for the recall of any elective officer, including any officer appointed in lieu of election or to fill a vacancy, by the service, filing and publication or posting of a notice of intention to circulate a recall petition pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11007.

Except when a person has been appointed to office pursuant to Section 10229 because no person had been nominated to office, proceedings may not be commenced against an officer of a city, county, special district, school district, community college district, or county board of education in the event of one or more of any of the following:

(a) He or she has not held office during his current term for more than 90 days.

(b) A recall election has been determined in his or her favor within the last six months.

(c) His or her term of office ends within six months or less.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Notice of Intention, Statement, and Answer [11020. - 11024.]

11020.

(a) The notice of intention shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and title of the officer sought to be recalled.

(2) A statement, not exceeding 200 words in length, of the reasons for the proposed recall.

(3) The printed name, signature, and residence address, including street and number, city, and ZIP Code, of each of the proponents of the recall. If a proponent cannot receive mail at the residence address, the proponent shall provide an alternative mailing address. The notice of intention shall include at least the number of proponents specified in
 subdivision (b). 

(4) The provisions of Section 11023.

(b) (1) For a state office, and for a local office where the number of registered voters in the electoral jurisdiction is at least 100,000, the minimum number of proponents listed on the notice of intention is 50, or equal to five times the number of signatures required to have been filed on the nomination paper of the officer sought to be recalled, whichever is higher.

(2) For a local office where the number of registered voters in the electoral jurisdiction is at least 1,000 but less than 100,000, the minimum number of proponents listed on the notice of intention is 30, or equal to three times the number of signatures required to have been filed
 on the nomination paper of the officer sought to be recalled, whichever is higher.

(3) For a local office where the number of registered voters in the electoral jurisdiction is less than 1,000, the minimum number of proponents listed on the notice of intention is 30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 1.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11021.

A copy of the notice of intention shall be served by personal delivery, or by certified mail, on the officer sought to be recalled. Within seven days of serving the notice of intention, the original thereof shall be filed, along with an affidavit of the time and manner of service, with the elections official or, in the case of the recall of a state officer, the Secretary of State. A separate notice of intention shall be filed for each officer sought to be recalled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11022.

A copy of the notice, except the provisions required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11020, shall be published at the proponents’ expense pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Publication shall be required unless there is no newspaper of general circulation able to provide timely publication in the jurisdiction of the officer sought to be recalled. If this publication is not possible, the notice, except the provisions required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11020, shall be posted in at least three public places within the jurisdiction of the officer to be recalled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 2.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11023.

(a) Within seven days after the filing of the notice of intention, the officer sought to be recalled may file with the elections official, or in the case of a state officer, the Secretary of State, an answer, in not more than 200 words, to the statement of the proponents.

(b) If an answer is filed, the officer shall, within seven days after the filing of the notice of intention, also serve a copy of it, by personal delivery or by certified mail, on one of the proponents named in the notice of intention.

(c) The answer shall be signed and shall be accompanied by the printed name and business or residence address of the officer sought to be recalled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11024.

(a) The statement and answer are intended solely for the information of the voters. No insufficiency in form or substance thereof shall affect the validity of the election proceedings.

(b) This section shall not be deemed to make the statement and answer, or the authors of the statement or answer, free or exempt from any civil or criminal action or penalty because of any false, slanderous, or libelous material included in the statement or answer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 3.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recall Petition [11040. - 11047.]

11040.

(a) The petition may consist of any number of separate sections, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures and matters required to be affixed by signers and circulators. The number of signatures attached to each section shall be at the pleasure of the person soliciting the signatures.

(b) Each section of the petition may consist of any number of separate pages. A page shall consist of each side of a sheet of paper on which any signatures appear.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11041.

(a) The proponents shall use the recall petition format provided by the Secretary of State and available from the county elections official or the Secretary of State. Before any signature may be affixed to a recall petition, each page of each section must bear all of the following in no less than 8-point type:

(1) (A) (i) If the officer sought to be recalled is a state officer, a request that an election be called to elect a successor to the officer.

(ii) If the officer sought to be recalled is a justice of the Supreme Court or of a court of appeal, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 16 of Article VI of the California Constitution, a request
 that the Governor appoint a successor to the officer.

(B) The petition shall not include a request for a successor to be elected or appointed if the officer sought to be recalled is a local officer.

(2) A copy of the notice of intention, including the statement of grounds for recall. For purposes of this paragraph, the copy of the notice of intention shall contain the names of at least 10 recall proponents that appear on the notice of intention and that are selected by the proponents. The elections official shall not require the names of more than 10 proponents to be included as part of the language of the notice of intention. The provisions of Section 11023 do not need to be included as part of the language of the notice of intention.

(3) The answer of the officer sought to be recalled, if any. If the officer sought to be recalled has not answered, the petition shall so state.

(4) For a recall of a member of the governing board of a school district, the estimate of the county elections official, in consultation with the school district, of the cost of conducting the special election.

(b) All petition sections shall be printed in uniform size and darkness with uniform spacing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 4.5.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11042.

(a) Within 10 days after filing of the answer to the notice of intention, or, if no answer is filed, within 10 days after the expiration of the seven-day period specified in Section 11023, the proponents shall file two blank copies of the petition with the elections official in his or her office during normal office hours as posted or, in the case of a recall of a state officer, with the Secretary of State, in his or her office during normal office hours as posted, who shall ascertain if the proposed form and wording of the petition meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b) At the time of the filing of the two blank copies of the petition, the proponents shall also file proof of publication of the notice of intention, if the notice of intention was published, or an affidavit of posting of the notice of intention, if the notice of intention was posted. The elections official or, in the case of a recall of a state officer, the Secretary of State, shall, within 10 days of receiving the blank copies of the petition, notify the proponents in writing of his or her finding.

(c) If the elections official finds that the requirements of this chapter are not met, the elections official shall include in his or her findings a statement as to what alterations in the petition are necessary. The proponents shall, within 10 days after receiving the notification, file two blank copies of the corrected petition with the elections official in his or her office during normal office hours as posted. The 10-day correction notification period and the 10-day filing period for corrected petitions shall be repeated until the elections official or the Secretary of State finds no alterations are required.

(d) No signature may be affixed to a recall petition until the elections official or, in the case of the recall of a state officer, the Secretary of State, has notified the proponents that the form and wording of the proposed petition meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11042.5.

(a) For a petition for the recall of a local officer, the county elections official shall make a copy of the petition available for public examination in the elections official’s office for 10 days, which shall run concurrently with the 10-day review period for the elections official to determine whether the form and wording of the petition are sufficient pursuant to Section 11042.

(b) (1) During the public examination period described in subdivision (a), a voter of the applicable electoral jurisdiction or the elections official may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the statement of the proponents or the answer of the
 officer included with the petition to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall issue only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter.
